Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-1303
Nebraska Office of Registered Apprenticeship; established; purposes.

(1) The Nebraska Office of Registered Apprenticeship is established within the department in accordance with 29 U.S.C. 50 and 29 C.F.R. part 29, as such section and regulations existed on January 1, 2026. The office shall be operated and managed by the commissioner or the commissioner's designee.

(2) The office is established for all of the following purposes:

(a) To serve as the state apprenticeship agency as defined in 29 C.F.R. 29.2, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2026;

(b) To serve as the registration agency for this state;

(c) To establish standards of apprenticeship for quality pre-apprenticeships, registered apprenticeships, and other apprenticeships;

(d) To establish requirements regarding the registration of quality pre-apprenticeship programs, registered apprenticeship programs, and other apprenticeship programs in the state when the sponsor of such programs chooses to certify or register the programs with the office; and

(e) To resolve disputes between parties to an apprenticeship agreement.

Laws 2026, LB847, § 3.
July 18, 2026